Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-202
Department of Justice; powers and duties.

The Department of Justice shall have the general control and supervision of all actions and legal proceedings in which the State of Nebraska may be a party or may be interested, and shall have charge and control of all the legal business of all departments and bureaus of the state, or of any office thereof, which requires the services of attorney or counsel in order to protect the interests of the state.

Laws 1919, c. 205, § 2, p. 904;

C.S.1922, § 4835;

C.S.1929, § 84-202;

R.S.1943, § 84-202;

Laws 1953, c. 354, § 1, p. 1131.

Constitutionality of act creating Department of Justice was raised but not decided. Smith v. State, 109 Neb. 579, 191 N.W. 687 (1922).

Attorney General is authorized to institute suits on official bond of state officer, and admissions in pleadings verified by him bind state. Paxton v. State, 59 Neb. 460, 81 N.W. 383 (1899).